Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Part 2 Administration by Department

31-10.3-7.
Administration by department.

This chapter shall be administered by the department of revenue, division of motor vehicles.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 11; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 11.

31-10.3-8.
Rulemaking authority.

The administrator for motor vehicles, department of revenue, is authorized to adopt and enforce any rules and regulations that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of chapters 1 — 27 of this title and any other laws the enforcement and administration of which are vested in the division of motor vehicles, including rules and regulations concerning specialized testing and standards for operators of commercial vehicles. Any former member of the Armed Forces, including, but not limited to, the Rhode Island National Guard, who received a military license to drive heavy equipment, shall be exempt from taking a road test when applying for a commercial driver’s license for a similar class of commercial motor vehicle for which the applicant has been previously licensed by the military, if such applicant is deemed to be otherwise qualified pursuant to 49 C.F.R. § 383.77.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 11; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 11; P.L. 2022, ch. 259, § 1, effective July 2, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 315, § 1, effective July 6, 2022.

31-10.3-9.
Authority to enter into agreements.

The administrator may enter into or make agreements, arrangements, policy(ies), or declarations to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 176, § 1.